Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB710.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the Public Employe Relations Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1006.1. A public employer may not discontinue a public employe's health care benefits during the period that the public employe is engaged in a strike.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617181920212223